Illinois, session 104th, HB2251.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-5 as follows: 6    (515 ILCS 5/1-5)  (from Ch. 56, par. 1-5)7    Sec. 1-5. Administrative agency. This Code shall be 8administered by and and under the direction of the Department 9of Natural Resources.10(Source: P.A. 89-445, eff. 2-7-96.)